New York, session 2025-2026, A10567.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Definitions. The following terms, when used in this act, 2 shall have the following meanings: 3 1. "Customer" shall mean a customer of record who received residential 4 or non-residential electric and/or gas supply services from a distrib- 5 ution utility at the time of a local resolution by such customer's muni- 6 cipality to participate in a municipally administered community-wide 7 energy aggregation program, provided that such customer did not receive 8 electric and gas supply services from an energy services company and/or 9 a publicly-owned utility. 10 2. "Distribution utility" or "distribution utilities" shall mean any 11 investor-owned utility in the state of New York. 12 3. "Participating customer" shall mean a customer who receives elec- 13 tric and/or gas supply services through a municipally administered 14 community-wide energy aggregation program, including residential and 15 commercial, and municipal customers. 16 4. "Community choice aggregation," "program," or "community energy 17 aggregation program" shall mean an inter-municipal agreement or a munic- 18 ipal resolution for the purpose of coordinating or initiating efforts by 19 a municipality or by community choice aggregators to request bids for 20 and potentially select an ESCO or ESCOs to provide electric and/or gas 21 supply services to participating residential, commercial and government 22 customers. 23 5. "Municipal governing board" shall mean a single municipal board for 24 local programs limited within municipal jurisdictional boundaries, or an EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD04570-01-5 A. 10567 2 1 inter-municipal agreement entered into by resolution of two or more 2 municipal boards aggregating load on a regional basis. 3 6. "Energy services company" or "ESCO" shall have the same meaning as 4 such term is used in subdivision 5 of section 44 of the public service 5 law. 6 7. "Municipality" or "municipalities" shall mean a city, town or 7 village located in the state of New York. 8 8. "Community choice aggregator" or "energy aggregator" shall mean a 9 municipality authorized pursuant to a local resolution to participate in 10 an inter-municipal agreement establishing a municipal energy aggregation 11 program to offer energy services to residential, commercial and munici- 12 pal customers located within the energy aggregator's jurisdictional 13 boundaries. 14 9. "Program administrator" shall mean a community choice aggregator 15 that is designated pursuant to a local municipal governing board resol- 16 ution or an inter-municipal agreement, or an employee or a contractor 17 designated by a community choice aggregator to fulfill the responsibil- 18 ities of: (i) requesting and compiling historical usage data of distrib- 19 ution utility customers as required under this act, (ii) submitting a 20 request for bids for energy supply services from ESCOs authorized to 21 supply electric and/or gas in New York state, and (iii) carrying out the 22 administration of the contract and implementation of aggregated 23 services. 24 10. "Department" shall mean the New York state department of public 25 service. 26 § 2. Community choice aggregation programs. 1. A municipality may, 27 after adopting a resolution approved by a majority of its governing 28 board, participate in a community choice aggregation program through an 29 inter-municipal agreement with one or more municipalities in order to 30 coordinate efforts, or through its own community choice aggregation 31 program to procure electric and/or gas supply services, and municipal 32 programs to develop energy efficiency and renewable energy installa- 33 tions, gas efficiency and renewable heating technologies on behalf of 34 its participating customers. 35 Such community choice aggregation program must provide for the desig- 36 nation of a program administrator to facilitate the operations of a 37 community choice aggregation program, including but not limited to the 38 receipt of customer historical usage data information from distribution 39 utilities pursuant to section three of this act and any communications 40 necessary with potential ESCOs that would provide electric and/or gas 41 supply services for such program, and otherwise entering into contracts 42 with other energy efficiency and renewable energy developers, including 43 gas efficiency and renewable heating technologies, providing power 44 and/or capacity to the community choice aggregation program. 45 2. A community choice aggregator shall be responsible for responding 46 to inquiries regarding the particular community choice aggregation 47 program in which it is a participant. Such community choice aggregator 48 shall provide contact information, including but not limited to a mail- 49 ing address, telephone number, e-mail address and fax number at which it 50 may be contacted in all notices to participating customers. 51 3. In establishing a contract for electric and/or gas services with an 52 ESCO, a program administrator shall comply with article 7 of the public 53 officers law. 54 § 3. Establishment of community choice aggregation program. 1. The 55 program administrator designated pursuant to an inter-municipal agree- 56 ment or municipal resolution establishing a community-wide aggregation A. 10567 3 1 program shall provide a copy of such agreement to the distribution util- 2 ities and submit a formal request for usage information provided for 3 under subdivision two of this section. 4 2. In order to augment energy efficiency and renewable energy 5 programs, and within 60 days of the establishment of a community choice 6 aggregation program or of an inter-municipal agreement establishing an 7 aggregation program and the formal request, distribution utilities 8 shall, at a reasonable cost as determined by the commission within 120 9 days of the effective date of this act, provide to the program adminis- 10 trator the following utility information regarding customers receiving 11 gas and/or electric supply services from such distribution utilities who 12 are eligible to receive service from the community choice aggregator: 13 (a) aggregate monthly usage (kWh) by rate schedule: energy consumption 14 (kWh) for the most recent 60 months of completed information for each 15 customer class for a given period of time for each municipality included 16 in the data request; 17 (b) customer-specific information from the current billing periods as 18 well as prior 60 months consisting of the following billing information: 19 meter number, service agreement number, name on agreement, service 20 address with zip code, mailing address with zip code, telephone number, 21 monthly kWh usage, monthly maximum demand where available, Baseline 22 Zone, low income residential participation (Home Energy Assistance 23 Program or HEAP), End Use Code (Heat Source), Service Voltage, Medical 24 Baseline, Meter Cycle, Bill Cycle, Level Payment Plan and other plans, 25 HP Load and Number of Units, monthly rate schedule for all accounts 26 within the community choice aggregator's territory; 27 (c) system wide residential and non-residential load shapes by New 28 York Load Zones and New York Control Area designations for the most 29 recent five years for which the distribution utility has completed 30 information; 31 (d) standard system average load profiles by rate class also referred 32 to as Dynamic Load Profiles & Static Load Profiles posted to the 33 distribution utility's website; 34 (e) quarterly or monthly aggregated participation data for energy 35 efficiency programs already tracked in New York State Energy Research 36 and Development Authority reports, as available; 37 (f) aggregate monthly usage (kWh) by zip code within a city code; 38 (g) customer-specific information consisting of: service agreement 39 number, monthly interval meter data where available, and rate schedule 40 for all accounts within the community choice aggregator's territory; 41 (h) number of service agreements in each rate schedule within a munic- 42 ipal energy aggregation program's territory or proposed territory; 43 (i) mapping of customer rate schedule to rate class; 44 (j) estimated annual generation revenues by community choice 45 aggregator's territory; 46 (k) estimation of peak coincident and non-coincident demands; 47 (l) data fitting community choice aggregator's annual usage to New 48 York Control Area load shapes; estimation of peak coincident and non- 49 coincident demands; 50 (m) total annual kWh loads of bundled customers and customers already 51 receiving ESCO service, firstly on a monthly basis and secondly on a 52 rate schedule basis within the community choice aggregator's territory; 53 (n) aggregated residential, small commercial, large commercial and 54 government annual kWh usage for the past three years in a format by tier 55 for each rate schedule, and for Time of Use (TOU) rates or other meter- A. 10567 4 1 specific rates, providing further separation by summer/winter peak, 2 partial peak, and off peak periods and summer/winter period; 3 (o) annual proportional share of system benefit charge energy effi- 4 ciency funds for a community choice aggregator's proposed territory; 5 (p) system benefit charge customer payment by city code; 6 (q) all electricity usage data at the most granular interval recorded 7 by the distribution utility; 8 (r) all monthly unbundled rate components and charges for each custom- 9 er; 10 (s) natural gas consumption and billing data for all customers located 11 within the territorial boundaries of the community choice aggregator, 12 similar in extent and specification to what is being requested on the 13 electricity side (i.e. customer data, consumption data at the most gran- 14 ular interval available, monthly bills within unbundled charges, and all 15 data necessary to calculate those charges); 16 (t) clarification and datasets used to associate gas meters with elec- 17 tric meters at the building level and customer level; 18 (u) all energy efficiency program data for all customers (by account 19 number, service ID number, street address, etc), listing account 20 contacts and all recorded activity and information, including but not 21 limited to on-site or online audits, benchmarking, retro-commissioning, 22 and energy use analyses and efficiency recommendations, and paperwork 23 filed by customers or contractors, and financing information such as on 24 bill financing amounts and repayment status, as available, as well as 25 any associated data sets such as building information on tenant/owner 26 occupancy, square footage and year built, as well as rebate code and 27 measure tables, as available; 28 (v) demand response program participation and all relevant metrics 29 recorded for these programs; 30 (w) the type of interconnect agreement and all relevant metrics asso- 31 ciated with customers that have already interconnected distributed 32 generation to the distribution utility's distribution grid; 33 (x) distribution grid data that could impact the siting of distributed 34 generation or demand-side assets, in a GIS format including shape-files 35 and any associated datasets; 36 (y) the number of customers, by class including indication of those 37 that are currently provided electric and/or gas supply service from an 38 ESCO, that are not served by a publicly-owned utility; 39 (z) the aggregate gas and electric usage of eligible customers, by 40 class served, for the 12-month period preceding the request; the system 41 peak hour or hours that determines capacity buying requirements, and to 42 the degree that it is available the aggregated load factor by class 43 served for the 12-month period preceding the request; and 44 (aa) to the degree that it is available, reasonable efforts to provide 45 more detailed historic information relating to energy usage character- 46 istics of customers, including but not limited to information by rate 47 class on meter type, the number of smart meters deployed, kWh usage and 48 peak demand information classification, meter reading cycle information, 49 load profile designating information, the number of customers enrolled 50 in budget billing plans, loss factor information, net-metering informa- 51 tion and any other information deemed useful by the community choice 52 aggregation program administrator to successfully solicit bids for and 53 implement the aggregation program. 54 § 4. Selection of ESCO providers. 1. Upon receipt of utility bulk 55 information required under section three of this act, the program admin- 56 istrator is authorized to advertise for the request of bids from ESCOs A. 10567 5 1 for the provision of services for a community choice aggregation 2 program. Any request for bids shall specify that a contract for aggre- 3 gation program services must: 4 (a) include price benchmarks, which shall provide for: 5 (i) monthly per kWh rates for electric supply services for each appli- 6 cable class of customers that are before the 12-month average monthly 7 price supply services provided by distribution utilities or lower than 8 the distribution utility's rate at the time of a request for bids as 9 provided for in this section, except insofar as customers voluntarily 10 pay higher rates to pay for and receive ownership benefits from energy 11 efficiency retrofits and/or renewable distributed generation; 12 (ii) monthly per Btu rates for gas supply services for each applicable 13 class of customers that are below the 12-month average monthly price of 14 supply services provided by distribution utilities or lower than the 15 distribution utility's rate at the time of a request for bids as 16 provided for in this section, except insofar as customers voluntarily 17 pay higher rates to pay for and receive ownership benefits from energy 18 efficiency retrofits and/or renewable distributed generation; 19 (b) provide that the ESCO will not levy any form of cancellation 20 charge to participating customers who, after receiving electric and/or 21 gas supply services from the ESCO, choose to receive such supply 22 services from their respective distribution utility; 23 (c) provide that the community choice aggregator municipal board may 24 levy a cancellation charge to participating customers only insofar as 25 such charges cover obligations to repay investment in renewable energy 26 and energy efficiency installations serving participating customers; 27 (d) provide for a website for participating customers to view the 28 monthly rates charged for electric and/or gas supply and any related 29 renewable energy and/or energy efficiency services and products being 30 offered by the community choice aggregation program administrator; and 31 (e) provide that any costs associated with preparation for or imple- 32 mentation of this program or contract shall be reflected in the bench- 33 mark per kWh and per Btu bid price. 34 2. (a) After a review of bids submitted for energy supply services, 35 community choice aggregator are authorized to select the ESCO or ESCOs 36 that will offer the best service, price, environmental, greenhouse gas 37 reductions, and local employment and local business benefits and other 38 factors considered, provided that the per kWh supply rate for electric- 39 ity and per Btu rate for gas supply services at the initiation of 40 service is lower than the distribution utility's average monthly rate 41 for supply services for the prior 12-month period, or lower than the 42 distribution utility's rate at the time of a request for bids as 43 provided for in this section and meet the requirements of subdivision 44 one of this section, provided that community choice aggregator, may at 45 their discretion, reject all bids or offers and re-advertise for new 46 bids or offers in a manner provided by this act. 47 (b) In making a selection, community choice aggregator shall (i) 48 select one ESCO for the provision of electric supply services; and (ii) 49 select one ESCO for the provision of gas supply services, provided 50 however that the community choice aggregators may select an ESCO to 51 provide both electric and gas supply service, provided further that 52 community choice aggregators may not select any ESCO that has been 53 deemed ineligible to provide energy services by the department. 54 (c) In making a selection, community choice aggregators may contract 55 with any number of contractors to design, build, operate, and/or main- A. 10567 6 1 tain renewable energy facilities and energy efficiency measures that 2 provide power or capacity to the community choice aggregation program. 3 3. After selection of an ESCO or ESCOs, the community choice aggrega- 4 tors are authorized to set rates and to enter into a contract for supply 5 services by a local law of the local governing board. Such contract 6 shall include: 7 (a) provisions prohibiting the ESCO or ESCOs from denying service to 8 any customer receiving service from such customer's distribution utility 9 at the commencement of such contract; 10 (b) monthly per kWh rates for electric supply services for each appli- 11 cable class of customers that is below the average monthly rate of 12 supply services provided by distribution utilities in the previous 13 12-month period or lower than the distribution utility's rate at the 14 time of a request for bids as provided for in this section, with 15 approval of any changes requiring a resolution of the community choice 16 aggregator's municipal board; 17 (c) monthly per Btu rates for gas supply services for each applicable 18 class of customers that is below the average monthly rate of supply 19 services provided by distribution utilities in the previous 12-month 20 period or lower than the distribution utility's rate at the time of a 21 request for bids as provided for in this section with approval of any 22 changes requiring a resolution of the community choice aggregator's 23 municipal board; 24 (d) provisions requiring the ESCO or ESCOs to provide electric and/or 25 gas supply rates lower than the distribution utility's electric and/or 26 gas supply rates pursuant to paragraphs (b) and (c) of this subdivision 27 for the duration of the contract, provided that a violation of this 28 provision shall subject such ESCO to refund participating customers at 29 the time of termination of a contract pursuant to section six of this 30 act, subject to a determination by resolution of the community choice 31 aggregator's municipal board; 32 (e) provisions prohibiting a community choice aggregator from opting 33 out of the contract during the term of such contract; 34 (f) provisions for the community choice aggregation municipal board to 35 decide whether to terminate a contract for services if an ESCO fails to 36 meet the price benchmarks pursuant to this act with the ESCO having 37 exclusive responsibility for all re-entry fees charged to a participat- 38 ing customer by distribution utilities for the resumption of supply 39 services; 40 (g) provisions indemnifying community choice aggregators from all 41 liabilities, damages and costs associated with the non-performance of an 42 ESCO operating under a contract for services; 43 (h) a requirement that the ESCO provide a performance bond if required 44 by the community choice aggregator; and 45 (i) any other requirement that the community choice aggregators deem 46 necessary for the adequate and reliable supply of electric and/or gas 47 supply services to participating customers. 48 § 5. Notice of community choice aggregation contract required. 1. Upon 49 the completion of the contract for services provided for under subdivi- 50 sion three of section four of this act, the program administrator shall 51 obtain from distribution utilities at a reasonable cost as determined by 52 the commission within 60 days of the effective date of this act their 53 lists of customers that may be affected by such contract and provide the 54 community choice aggregators with such information, including the trans- 55 fer of all data on each meter for all eligible accounts within the 56 community choice aggregator jurisdictional boundaries for the past five A. 10567 7 1 years. The community choice aggregator shall then notify such customers 2 as to the provisions of such contract, including but not limited to 3 price benchmarks. 4 2. Distribution utilities must make all reasonable preparations to 5 release customers who do not choose to opt-out pursuant to subdivision 6 three of this section from receiving electric and/or gas supply 7 services, provided that all customers shall continue to receive delivery 8 services from such utilities. 9 3. Upon completion of a contract provided for under subdivision three 10 of section four of this act, community choice aggregators must mail a 11 notice to each eligible customer not currently receiving supply services 12 from a publicly-owned utility, which shall include: 13 (a) that the customer's municipal board has chosen to participate in a 14 community choice aggregation contract; 15 (b) for customers not currently served by an ESCO, that unless such 16 customer elects to opt-out within 60 days of the postmarked notice, such 17 opt-out customers will become a participating customer and will receive 18 electric and/or gas supply services through a community choice aggre- 19 gation contract; 20 (c) for customers not currently served by an ESCO, instructions 21 detailing how a customer may submit an opt-out response, provided that 22 such procedures shall permit the customer to opt-out at no cost within 23 60 days by returning a reply mail form to the program administrator, as 24 determined by the community choice aggregation municipal board; 25 (d) for customers not currently served by an ESCO, that each customer 26 who does not elect to opt-out within the prescribed period may elect to 27 opt-out of such contract at any time, but may be subject to exit fees by 28 the community choice aggregator municipal board; 29 (e) for customers already served by an ESCO, that each customer wish- 30 ing to switch to service with the community choice aggregator may do so 31 by opting-in to the program within 60 days of the postmarked notice to 32 become a participating customer and receive electric and/or gas supply 33 services through the community choice aggregation contract; 34 (f) for customers already receiving ESCO service that elect to opt-in 35 to the program, instructions detailing how a customer may submit an 36 opt-in response, by returning a reply mail form to the program adminis- 37 trator, as determined by the community choice aggregation municipal 38 board; and 39 (g) that in the case of a participating customer the distribution 40 utility is no longer responsible for supply rates charged to such 41 customer and that all complaints about supply service under the aggre- 42 gation contract shall be the responsibility of the program administrator 43 and ESCO or ESCOs, according to the community choice aggregation 44 contract. 45 4. Immediately following the 60-day opt-out period provided for in 46 paragraph (b) of subdivision three of this section, a community choice 47 aggregator shall provide the program administrator with the following 48 information: 49 (a) the number of customers that received electric and/or gas supply 50 services from such distribution utility who are participating customers 51 by rate class; and 52 (b) the name, address, and account number of each participating 53 customer. 54 5. The program administrator, upon receipt of information required 55 under subdivision four of this section, shall submit such information 56 and the information provided for under subdivision two of section three A. 10567 8 1 of this act to the ESCO or ESCOs. Such ESCOs shall commence supply 2 services to participating customers. 3 § 6. Public service commission review. 1. Within 365 days of the 4 commencement of gas and/or electric supply services under an aggregation 5 contract, the commission, after consultation with the department shall 6 commence an audit to ensure such ESCO or ESCOs selected have achieved 7 benchmarks established pursuant to paragraph (b) of subdivision one of 8 section four of this act. 9 2. (a) If the commission determines that the ESCO or ESCOs providing 10 gas and/or electric gas supply services has failed to achieve such 11 benchmarks as established in subdivision three of section four of this 12 act, the contract for services established pursuant to subdivision three 13 of section four of this act shall be subject to termination by resol- 14 ution of the community choice aggregator's governing board. 15 (b) Within 30 days of the termination of a contract for services by 16 the community choice aggregator's municipal board, the ESCO shall issue 17 payment to each participating customer for any supply rates above those 18 specified in the contract, including the cost of any applicable re-entry 19 fees charged to a customer for resumption of supply services. 20 (c) The commission shall ensure that all customers eligible for 21 resumption of electric and/or gas supply service from their respective 22 distribution utility receive such services regardless of the actual 23 timing of the payment provided for under paragraph (b) of this subdivi- 24 sion. 25 3. An ESCO shall not levy any charge to a community choice aggregator 26 to cover expenses related to the termination of a contract. 27 § 7. Report. Within 30 months of the establishment of a supply 28 services contract for services or upon the termination of such contract, 29 the commission shall submit a report to the executive, the temporary 30 president of the senate, the speaker of the assembly, the chairs of the 31 senate energy and telecommunications committee and the assembly energy 32 committee detailing the performance of any aggregation contract. Such 33 report shall include the following information: 34 1. the number of participating customers served; 35 2. the ability of the ESCO or ESCOs selected under an aggregation 36 program to provide adequate supply services; 37 3. the actual supply rates charged under a contract for services; 38 4. the amount, if any, of participating customers whose residential or 39 non-residential service was disconnected; and 40 5. any other information the public service commission deems neces- 41 sary. 42 § 8. Energy services company bill of rights applicable to participat- 43 ing customers. For purposes of this act the term "customer" as defined 44 in paragraph (c) of subdivision 1 of section 349-d of the general busi- 45 ness law, shall include participating customers. 46 § 9. This act shall take effect immediately.